North Dakota, session 69, HB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-11-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-11-03. False information or report to law enforcement officers or security officials.
A person
1. An individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if that personindividual:
1. a. Gives false information or a false report to a law enforcement officer which that
personindividual knows to be false, and the information or report may interfere with an
investigation or may materially mislead a law enforcement officer; or
2. b. Falsely reports to a law enforcement officer or other security official the occurrence of a
crime of violence or other incident calling for an emergency response when that
personindividual knows that the incident did not occur. "Security official" means a public
servant responsible for averting or dealing withhandling emergencies involving public
safety.
2. An on duty law enforcement officer having probable cause to suspect an individual has
vexatiously provided a false report regarding another individual to a law enforcement officer or
security official shall report the information to the state's attorney of the county in which the
violation occurs.

H. B. NO. 1194 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1194.
House Vote: Yeas 79 Nays 12 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State